src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
<!-- {% raw %} -->
* **%^1VOW** vowel lengthening dummy 
* **%^IMPSG2** 
* **%^INDPRSSG3** 
* **%^PenVow2a** Changes penultimate vowel to a; e:a â:a 
* **%^PAL** for placing palatalization mark **ʹ** 
* **%^PALK** causes k:ǩ and g:ǧ 
* **%^PALNo** This is to facilitate +Sg+Nom lemma:stem equivalence; it removes palatal supersegmental 
* **%^PALI** Palatalisation causes â:i, etc. 
* **%^PALE** Palatalisation causes â:e, etc. 
* **%^PALÄ** Palatalisation causes â:ä, etc. 
* **%^PALẸ** Palatalisation causes å:ẹ suẹjj BUT suejjin (cf. 2012: 150, but ) 
* **%^PALÂ** Depalatalisation causes 0:â keâmnna 
* **%^PALÕ** Depalatalisation causes â:õ tiõttum 
* **%^RmVow** for removing vowels e, â, a before final consonant in stem 
* **%^UltRmVow** for removing vowels e, â, a after final consonant in stem 
* **%^RmCns** for removing stem final consonant, e.g. final z in ǩeeʹstes:ǩeâsttez ǩeâstta 
* **%^VC** Voicing s:z š:ž 
* %^Br break rule, e.g. eʹč^Br>{ʼØ}č
* **%^VOWLower** for lowering i>e, õ>â, â>ä, u>o, o>å 
* **%^U2Õ** lowers u>õ    
* **%^VOWRaise** for raising e>i, ä>e 
* **%^VOWXSH** for extra shortening 
* **%^VOWXL** for extralengthening 
* **%^Â** Indicates placement of â in stem 
* **%{VU%}** used with stuuʹl 
* **%{A1%}** used with vuejted 
* **%{E1%}** used with kåʹmrded 
* **%{Â1%}** used with mainsted 
* **%{Â1%}** archiform for MODIFIER LETTER ACUTE ACCENT used in stems where the lemma does not contain a MODIFIER LETTER ACUTE ACCENT and yet the paradigm requires one. 
* **%{EÂ%}** archiform for ie:eä variation, e.g. pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill:peâkka 

Hyphen at compound word boundary 
* **%{EÂ%}** - Zero versus hyphen in compounding 
* **%^Hyphen** - at compound word boundary with %- 
* **%^NoHyphen** - at compound word boundary 
<!-- {% endraw %} -->

## Escaped symbols 

Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc): 
* » 
* « 
* > 
* < 

The Usage extents are marked using following tags: 

* **+Err/Orth**  substandard, not in normative fst 
* **+Err/Orth-not-apos-but-hyph**  substandard, old orth look-alikes are separated by a hyphen
* **+Err/Orth-missing-apos**  substandard, missing apostrophe
* **+Err/Orth-k-kh** substandard k, not in normative fst ǩ(, should be  kuõccjiǩ and not kuõccjik)
* **+Err/Orth-a-y** substandard a, not in normative fst â
* **+Err/Orth-o-uq** substandard o, not in normative fst uʹ (e.g. illative kuʹmppe and not komppa)
* **+Err/Orth-no-q** substandard missing ʹ as in mâiʹd-ne (->) mâid-ne
* **+Err/Orth-extra-q** substandard extra ʹ as in aanarneʹǩ (->) aanarneǩ
* **+Err/Orth-pal-vow** substandard palatalized diphthong ieʹ should be eä or eâ; ueʹ should be uä, uâ <no soft sign>
* **+Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1** substandard raajeeʹl (->) raajjeeʹl
* **+Err/Lex** substandard, not in normative fst, no normative lemma 
* **+Err/DerSub** substandard for derivation, not in normative fst, no normative lemma 
* **+Err/CmpSub** substandard for compounding, not in normative fst (wrong form or POS in first part) 
* **+Err/MissingHyph** substandard for compounding, not in normative fst (needs hyph) 
* **+Err/Hyph** substandard for compounding, not in normative fst (should have no hyphen) 
* **+Err/SpaceCmp** used for compounds written apart - only retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser 
* **+Err/Spellrelax** used to tag spellrelaxed typos (tag is inserted via flag diacritics) 
* **+Err/GenreLeudd** 
* **+Err/Orth-nom-acc** 
* **+Err/Orth-nom-gen** 
|  **+Err/MissingSpace** | in use ins smi lexc 

* **+Use/Marg** marginal (?) 
* **+Use/-Spell** Excluded in speller 
* **+Use/SpellNoSugg** recognized but not suggested in speller 
* **+Use/Circ** circular paths (old ^C^) 
* **+Use/CircN** circular paths for the numerals (old ^N^) 
* **+Use/NG** not-generate, for ped generation isme-ped.fst 
* **+Use/NGminip** not-generate, for ped generation isme-ped.fst 
* **+Use/Ped** for use with pedagogical work 
* **+Largo** largo variant instead of allegro saaǥǥstõõllâd vs saǥstõõllâd 
* **+Allegro** never last element of compound words 
* **+MWE** never last element of compound words 
* **+Use/GC** – **only** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/-GC** – **never** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

### Dialect tags: 

* **+Dial/P** Paatsjoki (KKS) 
* **+Dial/Pets** Petsamo 
* **+Dial/N** Nuortjärvi (KKS) 
* **+Dial/S** Suonikylä (KKS) 

* **+South**  
* **+Txt**  

Compounding 

* **+Cmp** 
* **+CmpNP/First** 
* **+CmpNP/Pref** 
* **+CmpNP/None** 
* **+CmpN/PlG** 
* **+CmpN/SgG** 
* **+CmpN/SgN** 

* **+Cmp** - Dynamic compound. This tag should always be part 
           of a dynamic compound. It is important for 
           Apertium, and useful in other cases as well. 
* **+Cmp/Attr** - Attributive 
* **+Cmp/SgNom** - Singular Nominative 
* **+Cmp/SgGen** - Singular Genitive 
* **+Cmp/PlGen** - Plural Genitiv 
* **+Cmp/SplitR** - This is a split compound with the other part to 
           the right: "Arbeids- og inkluderingsdepartementet" 
           => Arbeids- = +Cmp/SplitR 
* **+Cmp/SplitL** - This is a split compound with the other part to the left 
* **+Cmp/Sh** - testing +Cmp/Sh 
* **+Cmp/Hyph** - on dynamic compounds that have a hyphen 
* **+Cmp/NoHyph** - On compounds that COULD have had a hyphen (and usually have), but doesn't 
* **+Cmp/SoftHyph** - Tags compounds containing SOFT HYPHENS (U+00AD) 
* **+Cmp/Cit** - Tags citation compounds, which can in principle    cover any word. Requires a hyphen. 
* **+Use/PMatch** - 
* **+Use/-PMatch** - 

## Flag diacritics 

| Flag | Explanation 
| --- | ---
| **@P.AssocColl.ON@** | Used with Kin terms and Ant 
| **@R.AssocColl.ON@** |
| **@C.AssocColl@** |

We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following 
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds 
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again: 

| Flag | Explanation 
| --- | --- 
|  **@P.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised 
|  **@D.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised 
|  **@C.NeedNoun@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised 

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed 
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is 
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will 
do no harm. 

| Flag | Explanation 
| --- | --- 
|  **@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@** | Require that words tagged as such only appear first 
|  **@D.CmpPref.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering ENDLEX 
|  **@P.CmpPref.FALSE@** | Block these words from making further compounds 
|  **@D.CmpLast.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering R 
|  **@D.CmpNone.TRUE@** | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding 
|  **@U.CmpNone.FALSE@** | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding 
|  **@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@** | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R 
|  **@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@** | Disallow words coming directly from root. 

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper 
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use 
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing 
given the proper use of these flags. 

| Flag | Explanation 
| --- | --- 
|  **@U.Cap.Obl@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj. 
|  **@U.Cap.Opt@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj. 
|  **@C.ErrOrth@** | tbw
|  **@R.ErrOrth.ON@** | tbw
|  **@D.ErrOrth.ON@** | tbw
|  **@P.ErrOrth.ON@** | tbw
|  **@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@** | tbw

* **@U.NUMORTH.YES@**
* **@N.NUMORTH.YES@**
* **@D.NUMORTH.YES@**

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

| @P.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

# Basic lexica, pointing to the other lexicon files 

* **LEXICON Root** 
* **Abbreviation ;** abbreviations 
* **Adposition ;** 
* **@U.Cap.Obl@ ProperNoun ;** 
* **@U.Cap.Opt@ ProperNoun ;** 

* **Subjunction ;** 
* **Conjunction ;** 
* **Interjection ;** 
* **Pronoun ;** 
* **Punctuation ;** 
* **Symbols ;** 
* **Particle ;** 
This generates from merged materials 
* **A_sms2x ;** This generates from merged materials 
* **TRAB_sms2x ;** transitive abbreviations 
* **TRNUMAB_sms2x ;** transitive abbreviations with numerals 
* **Adp_sms2x ;** adpositions 
* **Adv_sms2x ;** adverbs 
* **CC_sms2x ;** conjunctions 
* **CS_sms2x ;** subjunctions 
* **Det_sms2x ;** determiners 
* **Interj_sms2x ;** This generates from merged materials 
* **@P.AssocColl.ON@ N_Kin_sms2x ;** This generates from merged materials 
* **N_sms2x ;** This generates from merged materials 
* **+Cmp/SplitL+Use/SpellNoSugg#:%-# N_sms2x ;** This allows split compound nouns 
* **@P.AssocColl.ON@ N_Prop_sms2x ;** This generates from merged materials 
* **@U.Cap.Obl@ N_Prop_Toponyms_sms2x ;** Toponymy 
* **@U.Cap.Opt@ N_Prop_Toponyms_sms2x ;** Toponymy 
* **Num_sms2x ;** This generates from merged materials 
* **Pcle_sms2x ;** This generates from merged materials 
* **Prefix_sms2x ;** This generates from merged materials 
* **Pron_sms2x ;** This generates from merged materials 
* **V_sms2x ;** This generates from merged materials 

* **Numeral ;** This feeds Arabi numerals, borrowed from sme 

* **A_NEWWORDS ;** These are new adjectives beginning 2015-02-11 
* **ADP_NEWWORDS ;** These are new adpositions 
* **ADV_NEWWORDS ;** These are new adverbs 
* **CC_NEWWORDS ;** These are new conjunctions 
* **N_NEWWORDS ;** These are new nouns beginning 2015-01-10 
* **PCLE_NEWWORDS ;** These are particles 
* **PRON_NEWWORDS ;** These are pronouns 
* **@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_NEWWORDS ;** These are new proper nouns beginning 2015-03-04 
* **@U.Cap.Opt@ PROP_NEWWORDS ;** These are new proper nouns beginning 2015-03-04 
* **@U.Cap.Obl@ TOPONYMS_NEWWORDS ;** 2016-02-06 
* **@U.Cap.Opt@ TOPONYMS_NEWWORDS ;** 2016-02-06 
* **V_NEWWORDS ;** These are new verbs 
* **ProperNoun-smi ;** work with smi 2018-08-23 

INCOMING _lemma:stem Contlex_ sets to be distinguished from glossing in progress 

NounRoot 

VerbRoot 

INTERJ_ 
Interjections 
